Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-325
Administrator of Nebraska veterans homes; qualifications.

The administrator of the Nebraska veterans homes shall be a licensed nursing home administrator licensed under the Nursing Home Administrator Practice Act. Qualified applicants for the position of administrator who were discharged or otherwise separated with a characterization of honorable from the armed forces of the United States during a period of war as defined in section 80-401.01 shall be given a preference over other applicants.

Laws 1913, c. 179, § 11, p. 538;

R.S.1913, § 7189;

Laws 1917, c. 131, § 1, p. 312;

Laws 1921, c. 200, § 1, p. 722;

C.S.1922, § 6840;

C.S.1929, § 83-111;

Laws 1935, c. 185, § 2, p. 685;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 83-111;

R.S.1943, § 83-124;

Laws 1947, c. 329, § 1, p. 1045;

Laws 1951, c. 320, § 1, p. 1092;

Laws 1953, c. 340, § 1, p. 1113;

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 71, p. 3107;

Laws 1971, LB 334, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 83-124;

Laws 1997, LB 396, § 14;

Laws 2001, LB 10, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 54, § 28;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1310.

Nursing Home Administrator Practice Act, see section 38-2401.